Connecticut, session 2026, HB05405.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 29-221 of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 As used in this chapter: (1) "Board" means the Examining Board for
4 Crane Operators established under section 29-222, as amended by this
5 act; (2) "commissioner" means the Commissioner of Administrative
6 Services; (3) "crane" means power-operated equipment that can hoist,
7 lower and horizontally move a suspended load and which has a
8 manufacturer's maximum rated hoisting or lifting capacity exceeding
9 two thousand pounds, including, but not limited to: (A) Articulating
10 cranes such as knuckle-boom cranes, (B) crawler cranes, (C) floating
11 cranes, (D) cranes on barges, (E) locomotive cranes, (F) mobile cranes
12 such as wheel-mounted, rough terrain, all-terrain, commercial truck-
13 mounted and boom truck cranes, (G) multipurpose machines when
14 configured to hoist and lower, by means of a winch or hook, and
15 horizontally move a suspended load, (H) industrial cranes such as
16 carry-deck cranes, (I) dedicated pile drivers when used in construction,
17 demolition or excavation work, (J) service or mechanic trucks with a
18 hoisting device, (K) cranes on monorails, (L) tower cranes such as fixed
19 jib hammerhead boom, luffing boom and self-erecting, (M) pedestal
LCO 1 of 8

Substitute Bill No. 5405
20 cranes, (N) portal cranes, (O) overhead and gantry cranes, (P) straddle
21 cranes, (Q) side boom cranes, (R) derricks, and (S) variations of such
22 equipment; (4) "hoisting equipment", other than cranes, means
23 motorized equipment (A) used in construction, demolition or
24 excavation work, (B) at a construction site for a project, other than a
25 project involving residential structures of less than four stories, the
26 estimated cost of which is more than one million two hundred fifty
27 thousand dollars, and (C) which has a manufacturer's rated hoisting or
28 lifting capacity exceeding five tons and a manufacturer's rated
29 maximum reach in excess of thirty-two feet; (5) "department" means the
30 Department of Administrative Services; [and] (6) "apprentice" means a
31 person who is not licensed under this chapter, who has filed an
32 application for a license with the board and whose employer has
33 registered him or her with the board to learn crane operations or
34 hoisting equipment operations under the direct supervision of a
35 licensed operator in accordance with section 29-224c; and (7) "lessee"
36 means a person, firm, partnership, corporation, limited liability
37 company, association or other legal entity that rents or leases a crane or
38 hoisting equipment.
39 Sec. 2. Section 29-222 of the general statutes is repealed and the
40 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
41 There shall be in the Department of Administrative Services an
42 Examining Board for Crane Operators consisting of [five] seven
43 members who shall be residents of this state. Members shall be
44 appointed by the Governor subject to the provisions of section 4-9a. One
45 member shall be an employee of the department, [one member shall be
46 a crane operator] two members shall be crane operators having at least
47 ten years of experience, [one member] two members shall represent the
48 interests of crane owners and two members shall be public members.
49 Members shall not be compensated for their services but shall be
50 reimbursed for necessary expenses in the performance of their duties. A
51 quorum of the board for the purpose of transacting business shall exist
52 only when there is present, in person, a majority of its membership. Any
53 member absent from (1) three consecutive meetings of the board, or (2)
LCO 2 of 8

Substitute Bill No. 5405
54 fifty per cent of such meetings during any calendar year shall be deemed
55 to have resigned from the board.
56 Sec. 3. Subsection (b) of section 29-223a of the general statutes is
57 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
58 1, 2026):
59 (b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to: (1) Engineers
60 under the jurisdiction of the United States, (2) engineers or operators
61 employed by public utilities or industrial manufacturing plants, (3) any
62 person operating either a bucket truck or a digger derrick designed and
63 used for an electrical generation, electrical transmission, electrical
64 distribution, electrical catenary or electrical signalization project, if such
65 person: (A) Holds a valid limited electrical line contractor or
66 journeyman's license issued pursuant to chapter 393 or any regulation
67 adopted pursuant to said chapter, or (B) has engaged in the installation
68 of electrical line work for more than one thousand hours, or (C) has
69 enrolled in or has graduated from a federally recognized electrical
70 apprenticeship program, (4) persons engaged in (A) the recreational
71 boating or fishing industry, except when engaged in construction-
72 related work, or [in] (B) agriculture, [or arboriculture,] or (5) persons
73 engaged in activities, or using equipment, excluded under section 29-
74 221a.
75 Sec. 4. Subsection (b) of section 29-224 of the general statutes is
76 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
77 1, 2026):
78 (b) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to:
79 (1) Engineers under the jurisdiction of the United States, (2) engineers
80 or operators employed by public utilities or industrial manufacturing
81 plants, (3) any person operating either a bucket truck or a digger derrick
82 designed and used for an electrical generation, electrical transmission,
83 electrical distribution, electrical catenary or electrical signalization
84 project, if such person: (A) Holds a valid limited electrical line contractor
85 or journeyman's license issued pursuant to chapter 393 or any
LCO 3 of 8

Substitute Bill No. 5405
86 regulation adopted pursuant to said chapter, or (B) has engaged in the
87 installation of electrical line work for more than one thousand hours, or
88 (C) has enrolled in or has graduated from a federally recognized
89 electrical apprenticeship program, (4) persons engaged in (A) the
90 recreational boating or fishing industry, except when engaged in
91 construction-related work, or [in] (B) agriculture, [or arboriculture,] (5)
92 persons engaged in activities, or using equipment, excluded under
93 section 29-221a, or (6) persons operating equipment, except a tower
94 crane, that can hoist, lower and horizontally move a suspended load and
95 has a manufacturer's maximum rated hoisting or lifting capacity
96 exceeding two thousand pounds but not exceeding ten thousand
97 pounds who, pursuant to federal Occupational Safety and Health
98 Administration Standard 1926.1427, are (A) certified by an accredited
99 crane operator testing organization, (B) qualified by an audited
100 employer program, (C) qualified by the United States military, or (D)
101 licensed pursuant to this chapter.
102 Sec. 5. Section 29-224b of the general statutes is repealed and the
103 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
104 The commissioner or any employee of the Department of
105 Administrative Services, while engaged in the performance of [his or
106 her] the commissioner's or employee's duties, may (1) enter at all
107 reasonable hours into and upon any premises in or on which the
108 commissioner or employee has reason to believe a crane or hoisting
109 equipment is located for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of
110 this chapter and the regulations adopted thereunder, (2) require a crane
111 operator or hoisting equipment operator to produce for verification
112 such operator's license issued under this chapter, (3) require a crane
113 owner to produce for verification such owner's certificate of registration
114 issued under this chapter, and (4) require a crane operator, hoisting
115 equipment operator, crane owner, hoisting equipment owner or lessee
116 to produce any document establishing an agreement between such
117 operator, owner or lessee and a person, firm, partnership, corporation,
118 limited liability company, association or other legal entity to perform
119 crane or hoisting work on the premises.
LCO 4 of 8

Substitute Bill No. 5405
120 Sec. 6. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) The Commissioner of
121 Administrative Services or an employee of the Department of
122 Administrative Services may issue a stop work order against a crane
123 owner, crane operator, hoisting equipment owner, hoisting equipment
124 operator, lessee or person that contracted with the owner, operator or
125 lessee to perform crane or hoisting work, if the commissioner or
126 employee determines that such owner, operator, lessee or person has
127 committed one or more of the following violations: (1) Demonstrating
128 incompetence or negligence, (2) permitting the operation of the owner's,
129 operator's or lessee's crane in an unsafe manner, or (3) failing to comply
130 with the provisions of section 29-223a of the general statutes, as
131 amended by this act, or 29-224 of the general statutes, as amended by
132 this act. For purposes of this section, the term "person" includes firms,
133 partnerships, corporations, limited liability companies, associations and
134 any other legal entities.
135 (b) Such stop work order: (1) (A) Shall require the cessation of the
136 owner's, operator's or lessee's crane, hoisting equipment or related
137 lifting operations at the place or premises where the violation was
138 determined to have occurred, and (B) shall not require the cessation of
139 unrelated construction activities at such place or premises unless such
140 activities present an immediate danger to any individual or property,
141 (2) shall be effective when served upon the owner, operator or lessee
142 and the person that contracted with the owner, operator or lessee to
143 perform crane or hoisting work at the place or premises subject to such
144 stop work order by posting notice of the stop work order in a
145 conspicuous location at such place or premises, and (3) shall remain in
146 effect until the commissioner (A) determines that the owner, operator,
147 lessee or person has resolved the violation or violations that gave rise to
148 the stop work order, and (B) issues an order releasing such stop work
149 order.
150 (c) Any crane owner, crane operator, hoisting equipment owner,
151 hoisting equipment operator, lessee or person who has been served with
152 a stop work order pursuant to subsection (b) of this section may request
153 an administrative hearing to contest such stop work order. Such request
LCO 5 of 8

Substitute Bill No. 5405
154 shall be made in writing to the commissioner not more than ten days
155 after such owner, operator, lessee or person was served with such stop
156 work order. Such hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the
157 provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes.
158 (d) The commissioner shall notify the Examining Board for Crane
159 Operators established under section 29-222 of the general statutes, as
160 amended by this act, of each stop work order issued under subsection
161 (a) of this section and any violation of such a stop work order.
162 (e) The commissioner shall adopt regulations, in accordance with the
163 provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, to carry out the purposes
164 of this section.
165 Sec. 7. Section 29-225 of the general statutes is repealed and the
166 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
167 (a) The board may suspend or revoke a crane operator's license, a
168 hoisting equipment operator's license or an apprentice's certificate, after
169 notice and hearing in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, upon
170 a finding that the holder has demonstrated incompetence or [has been
171 guilty of] negligence in the performance of [his or her] such holder's
172 work.
173 (b) The board may suspend or revoke a crane owner's registration,
174 after notice and hearing in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54,
175 upon a finding that the holder has failed to properly maintain [his or
176 her] such holder's crane or has permitted the operation of [his or her]
177 such holder's crane in an unsafe manner.
178 (c) (1) The board may impose a civil penalty of not more than [three]
179 five thousand dollars per violation per day on any crane or hoisting
180 equipment owner or operator, [who violates] lessee or person that
181 contracted with an owner, operator or lessee to perform crane or
182 hoisting work, after notice and hearing in accordance with the
183 provisions of chapter 54, upon a finding that the owner, operator or
184 lessee has violated any provision of this chapter or any regulations
LCO 6 of 8

Substitute Bill No. 5405
185 adopted thereunder. For purposes of this section, the term "person"
186 includes firms, partnerships, corporations, limited liability companies,
187 associations and any other legal entities.
188 (2) The board may impose a civil penalty of not more than one
189 thousand dollars per violation per day on any crane or hoisting
190 equipment owner or operator or lessee, after notice and hearing in
191 accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, upon a finding that the
192 owner, operator or lessee has operated, or allowed the operation of, such
193 owner's, operator's or lessee's crane or hoisting equipment without a
194 valid license or certificate of registration, as applicable, issued under this
195 chapter.
196 (3) If the board, after notice and hearing in accordance with the
197 provisions of chapter 54, finds that a crane or hoisting equipment owner
198 or operator, lessee or person that contracted with an owner, operator or
199 lessee to perform crane or hoisting work violated a stop work order
200 issued pursuant to section 6 of this act, the board shall impose a fine of
201 five thousand dollars per day for each day the stop work order was
202 violated.
203 (d) The board shall not renew a license or registration of any crane or
204 hoisting equipment owner or operator who has an unpaid civil penalty
205 until such time as such penalty is paid in full.
206 (e) The board, at any time after the issuance of a notice alleging a
207 violation of any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted
208 thereunder, may accept, in lieu of a hearing in accordance with the
209 provisions of chapter 54, an agreement by any person charged with such
210 violation. Negotiations relating to any such agreement shall be
211 confidential and not subject to disclosure pursuant to the Freedom of
212 Information Act, as defined in section 1-200, but any such agreement
213 itself shall be a public record for purposes of said act.
214 (f) The Commissioner of Administrative Services may apply for the
215 enforcement of any civil penalty imposed pursuant to this section
216 against any person who is not licensed as a crane or hoisting equipment
LCO 7 of 8

Substitute Bill No. 5405
217 operator or who has not obtained a registration of any crane under
218 subsection (a) of section 29-224 to the superior court for the judicial
219 district of Hartford, or to any judge thereof if the same is not in session,
220 for an order (1) directing payment in full of any unpaid balance of such
221 civil penalty, or (2) temporarily and permanently restraining and
222 enjoining such person from performing or allowing the performance of
223 the work of a crane or hoisting equipment operator. The application for
224 such order, and for such other appropriate decree or process, shall be
225 brought and the proceedings thereon conducted by the Attorney
226 General.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 29-221
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 29-222
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 29-223a(b)
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 29-224(b)
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 29-224b
Sec. 6 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 7 October 1, 2026 29-225
PS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 8 of 8